Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.525.040

Portable buildings or classrooms.

State funding assistance shall not be denied to any school district undertaking any construction, repairs[,] or improvements for school district purposes solely on the ground that said construction, repairs[,] and improvements are in connection with portable buildings or classrooms.

[ 2009 c 129 s 3; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.47.075. Prior: 1953 c 158 s 1. Formerly RCW 28A.47.075, 28.47.075.]

NOTES:

Intent—2009 c 129: See note following RCW 28A.335.230.